Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.52.040

Negotiated agreements—Procedures for binding arbitration.

A board of trustees or an employee organization that enters into a negotiated agreement under RCW 28B.52.030 may include in the agreement procedures for binding arbitration of the disputes arising about the interpretation or application of the agreement including but not limited to nonretention, dismissal, denial of tenure, and reduction in force.

[ 1987 c 314 s 6.]